Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.902

Purpose—1985 c 30.

The purpose of this act is to make technical corrections to chapter 149, Laws of 1984, and to ensure that the changes made in that chapter meet the constitutional requirements of Article II, section 19 of the state Constitution.

[ 1985 c 30 s 1.]